Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,102
Collectors; nursery
stock distributor's license required; inspection.

Collectors shall
be required to obtain a nursery stock distributor's license
and shall be required to apply for an additional inspection
for the certification of the collected nursery stock as provided in section
2-1095. All collected nursery stock shall be labeled as such.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 31;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 12.